Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.820

Elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account.

The elementary and secondary school emergency relief III account is created in the state treasury. Revenues attributable to section 2001, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 2022 c 157 s 8. Prior: 2021 c 334 s 1901.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.